Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Marine  Board, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 7,277,632
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 10,839,113
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 8,563,458
(4) Aquatic invasive species ........... $ 1,648,568
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the State Marine Board, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 233,760
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 4,035,575
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 1,990,930
(4) Aquatic invasive species ........... $ 60,000
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 16, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 2